Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201468-1726
Assistance under
act; eligibility factors.

Based on the comprehensive
assets assessment, each individual and family receiving assistance under the
Welfare Reform Act shall reach for his or her highest level of economic self-sufficiency
or the family's highest level of economic self-sufficiency. The following
eligibility factors shall apply:

(1) Financial resources, excluding the primary home and furnishings
and the primary automobile, shall not exceed four thousand dollars in value
for a single individual and six thousand dollars in value for two or more
individuals;

(2) Available resources, including, but not limited to, savings
accounts and real estate, shall be used in determining financial resources, except that income and assets described
in section 68-1201 shall not be included in determination of available resources
under this section;

(3) Income received by family members, except income earned
by children attending school and
except as provided in section 68-1201, shall be considered in
determining total family income. Income earned by an individual or a family
by working shall be treated differently than unearned income in determining
the amount of cash assistance as follows:

(a) Earned income shall be counted in determining the level
of cash assistance after disregarding an amount of earned income equal to
twenty percent of earned income or other incentives to work;

(b) Financial assistance provided by other programs that support
the transition to economic self-sufficiency shall be considered to the extent
the payments are intended to provide for life's necessities; and

(c) Financial assistance or those portions of it intended
for books, tuition, or other self-sufficiency-related expenses shall not be
counted in determining financial resources. Such assistance shall include,
but not be limited to, school grants, scholarships, vocational rehabilitation
payments, Job Training Partnership Act payments, income or assets described in section 68-1201, and
education-related loans or other loans that are expected to be repaid; and

(4) Individuals and families shall pursue potential sources
of economic support, including, but not limited to, unemployment compensation
and child support.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 26;

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB359, § 5.
July 18, 2014